Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Bluegrass Turns Green Program

42.580.
Definitions for KRS 42.580 to 42.588.

As used in KRS

42.580

to

42.588

:

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

“Demand-side management” has the same meaning as in KRS

278.010

;

“Energy audit” has the same meaning as in KRS

56.770

;

“Energy-efficient heating, cooling, ventilation, or hot water system” has the same meaning as in KRS

141.435

;

“Energy-efficient interior lighting system” has the same meaning as in KRS

141.435

;

“Energy-efficient windows and storm doors” has the same meaning as in KRS

141.435

;

“Engineered demand-side management project” means a project undertaken to reduce the amount of energy consumed in an existing structure, including but not limited to:

Energy-efficient heating, cooling, ventilation, or hot water systems;

Energy-efficient interior lighting systems;

Energy-efficient windows and storm doors;

Qualified energy property;

Upgraded insulation;

Solar water-heating systems; and

Any other energy conservation measures that will reduce energy costs, including those that will use solar power, either active or passive;

“Private sector building” means a building owned by a private retail, commercial, or industrial business;

“Public sector building” means a building owned by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, any public university of the Commonwealth, or any public community college of the Commonwealth;

“Qualified energy property” has the same meaning as in KRS

141.435

;

“Simple payback period” has the same meaning as in KRS

56.770

;

“Solar water-heating system” has the same meaning as in KRS

141.435

; and

“Upgraded insulation” has the same meaning as in KRS

141.435

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 139, § 21, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 20, effective February 25, 2010; 2014, ch. 65, § 5, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

42.582.
Kentucky Bluegrass Turns Green Program — Purposes — Funding.

There is established in the cabinet the Kentucky Bluegrass Turns Green Program for the purposes of:

Concentrating on energy demand-side management in private and public sector buildings;

Generating savings to taxpayers and the Commonwealth;

Allowing for continued economic development;

More efficiently using the Commonwealth’s precious natural resources; and

Establishing the Commonwealth as a benchmark state for demand-side management efforts.

The Kentucky Blue Grass Turns Green Program shall consist of the bluegrass turns green public sector grant fund established in KRS

42.584

and the bluegrass turns green private sector loan fund established in KRS

42.586

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 139, § 22, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 21, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

42.584.
Bluegrass turns green public sector grant fund — Purpose — Eligibility — Payback period — Administrative regulations.

The bluegrass turns green public sector grant fund is created as a trust and agency fund. The fund shall be administered by the cabinet and shall consist of:

Proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for purposes of the trust and agency fund; and

Funds derived from the bond issuance authorized under 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 139, sec. 27.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, fund amounts not expended at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. Any interest earnings of the trust and agency fund shall become part of the trust and agency fund and shall not lapse.

Trust and agency fund moneys shall be used by the cabinet to provide grants to the public sector for engineered demand-side management projects in public sector buildings. The cabinet shall not award more than one (1) grant per public university campus or public community college campus within an eighteen (18) month period.

To be eligible for a grant under this section, the cost of a proposed engineered demand-side management project shall be at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) per project.

Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2013, the simple payback period for an approved engineered demand-side management project shall be no more than five (5) years. Beginning July 1, 2013, the cabinet may consider a simple payback period of no more than twelve (12) years.

Moneys in the grant fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

The cabinet shall not approve an applicant for a grant under this section, unless the applicant:

Agrees to undergo and pay for an energy audit to establish a baseline of energy consumption; and

Meets all the requirements established in this section and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 139, § 23, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 22, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

42.586.
Bluegrass turns green private sector loan fund — Purpose — Eligibility — Payback period — Interest rate — Administrative regulations.

The bluegrass turns green private sector loan fund is created as a separate revolving fund. The fund shall be administered by the cabinet and shall consist of:

Proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for purposes of the revolving fund;

Loan repayments made by the private sector;

Funds derived from the bond issuance authorized under 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 139, sec. 28.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. Any interest earnings of the fund shall become part of the revolving fund and shall not lapse.

Revolving fund moneys shall be used by the cabinet to provide low-interest loans to the private sector for engineered demand-side management projects in private sector buildings. The cabinet shall not have more than one (1) loan outstanding at a time to any private retail, commercial, or industrial business.

To be eligible for a loan under this section, the cost of a proposed engineered demand-side management project shall be at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) per project.

Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2013, the simple payback period for an approved engineered demand-side management project shall be no more than five (5) years. Beginning July 1, 2013, the cabinet may consider a simple payback period of no more than twelve (12) years.

The loans provided under this section shall be subject to the prime interest rate minus one percent (1%).

Moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

The cabinet shall not approve an applicant for a loan under this section, unless the applicant:

Can demonstrate that the applicant has no outstanding liabilities with the Commonwealth;

Can demonstrate that the applicant has a positive payment history with the applicant’s electricity provider for the preceding three (3) consecutive years;

Agrees to undergo and pay for an energy audit to establish a baseline of energy consumption; and

Meets all the requirements established in this section and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 139, § 24, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 23, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

42.588.
Administrative regulations — Reports to Governor and Legislative Research Commission.

The cabinet shall, by administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A:

Develop a method to score applications for the bluegrass turns green private sector loan fund established in KRS

42.586

and the bluegrass turns green public sector grant fund established in KRS

42.584

;

Develop a list of companies qualified to perform energy audits for the purposes of determining a baseline of energy consumption and any subsequent projected energy cost savings for:

Private sector recipients of low-interest loans provided from the bluegrass turns green private sector loan fund established in KRS

42.586

; and

Public sector recipients of grants awarded from the public sector turns green grant fund established in KRS

42.584

; and

Establish a process for the collection of loan payments from the private sector to repay amounts that were made available under the bluegrass turns green loan private sector fund.

The cabinet shall also promulgate any other administrative regulations necessary to administer the provisions of KRS

42.580

to

42.588

.

The cabinet shall report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission on or before November 1, 2009, and on or before each November 1 thereafter, the following for the bluegrass turns green private sector loan fund and the bluegrass turns green public sector grant fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year:

The number of applicants;

A description of the engineered demand-side management projects on which loans or grants were provided;

The total amount loaned to the private sector and the total amount of grants provided to the public sector;

The projected private sector energy cost savings;

The projected public sector energy cost savings;

The number of applicants and the amount of loan and grants for which funding was not available; and

Based upon the energy audits performed, the amount of increased energy capacity realized.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 139, § 25, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, § 24, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”